Oregon, session 2026R1, HB4170.
Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. The Housing and Community Services Department shall study housing. The
department shall submit a report in the manner provided by ORS 192.245, and may include
recommendations for legislation, to the interim committees of the Legislative Assembly re-
lated to housing no later than September 15, 2027.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2026 Act is repealed on January 2, 2028.

NOTE: Matter in boldfaced type in an amended section is new; matter [italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in boldfaced type.
LC 170